Maine, session 132, LD1496.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 24-A MRSA §4304-B is enacted to read:
§4304-B. Prior authorization for treatment of chronic conditions and conditions
requiring long-term care
1. Length of prior authorization for treatment for chronic conditions and
conditions requiring long-term care. If a utilization review entity requires a prior
authorization for health care services for the treatment of a chronic condition or a condition
requiring long-term care, the approved prior authorization remains valid for the duration of
the treatment or for one year, whichever is longer. If health care services for the treatment
of a chronic condition or a condition requiring long-term care are necessary for more than
one year, a utilization review entity may not require the renewal of the prior authorization
more frequently than once every 5 years. The prior authorization approval is valid from the
date the enrollee receives the notice of the approval. If an enrollee has received prior
authorization for health care services for the treatment of a chronic condition or a condition
requiring long-term care, the carrier shall honor the prior authorization until the prior
authorization expires as long as the enrollee continues to be covered under the same health
plan.
2. Coverage restriction prohibition; notice. A health plan may not restrict coverage
for a health care service under this section, including a prescription, that received prior
authorization approval under a previous health plan within 90 days of enrollment in the
new health plan by an enrollee who is stable on that health care service, as determined by
a health care provider. The health plan must provide the enrollee with at least 90 days'
notice prior to restricting coverage pursuant to this subsection.
Sec. 2. 24-A MRSA §4311, sub-§1-A, ¶A, as amended by PL 2019, c. 273, §3, is
further amended to read:
A. The carrier must determine whether it will cover the drug requested and notify the
enrollee, the enrollee's designee, if applicable, and the person who has issued the valid
prescription for the enrollee of its coverage decision within 72 hours or 2 business days,
whichever is less, following receipt of the request. A carrier that grants coverage under
this paragraph must provide coverage of the drug for the duration of the prescription,
including refills. A prior authorization for a prescription is valid for the duration of the
prescription, including refills, or one year, whichever is longer. A health plan may not
require the renewal of a prior authorization more frequently than once every 5 years
for a prescription that continues for more than one year. The prior authorization
approval is valid from the date the enrollee receives notice of the approval and remains
valid for a prescription drug prescribed by a provider regardless of a change in dosage.
A utilization review entity may rescind the prior authorization approval for prescription
drug doses that exceed limitations set by federal or state law, regulation or rule.
Sec. 3. 24-A MRSA §4311, sub-§1-B is enacted to read:
1-B. Prescription coverage restriction prohibition; notice. A health plan may not
restrict coverage for a prescription that received prior authorization approval under a
previous health plan within 90 days of enrollment in the new health plan by an enrollee
who is stable on that health care service, as determined by a health care provider. The health
Page 1 - 132LR0788(01)

414 plan must provide the enrollee with at least 90 days' notice prior to restricting coverage
425 pursuant to this subsection.